Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2951.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 44, chapter 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 27, to read: ARTICLE 27. SUBSCRIPTION REGULATIONS START_STATUTE44-1383. Automatic renewal contracts; requirements; definition A. A person that offers to a consumer in this state an automatic renewal contract: 1. Shall allow the consumer to cancel the consumer's subscription by using the same method the consumer used to enroll in the subscription and may not add extra requirements or steps to the cancellation process. 2. Shall provide clear, conspicuous disclosure of a subscription's terms, including renewal policies and cancellation instructions, at the time the consumer enrolls in a subscription. 3. May make a retention offer or incentive to a consumer only after the consumer indicates an intent to cancel the consumer's subscription.  The retention offer or incentive may not impede or complicate the cancellation process. B. A person that offers to a consumer in this state an automatic renewal contract, Thirty-one days before an annual automatic renewal, shall send to each consumer who has an automatic renewal contract a reminder of the automatic renewal for the subscription by using the same method the consumer used to enroll in the subscription in order to provide the consumer an opportunity to opt out of the automatic renewal contract. c. For the purposes of this section, "automatic renewal contract" means a plan or arrangement in which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement for goods or services is automatically renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term or on a continuous or recurring basis.END_STATUTE